Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Division 3. Electrical Licensing

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

53 C.J.S. Licenses §§ 34, 40.

§ 35-9-122.
Chief electrical inspector responsible for licensing.

The chief electrical inspector is responsible for licensing electrical contractors, master electricians, journeyman electricians, low voltage electrical contractors, limited electrical contractors, low voltage technicians and limited technicians and shall pass on the fitness and qualifications of applicants for licenses. Every applicant for a license under this chapter shall provide his social security number to the chief electrical inspector.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.22; W.S. 1977, §§ 35-9-136, 35-9-137; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 1997, ch. 193, § 2.

§ 35-9-123.
Electrical installations to be performed by licensed electricians; exceptions.

Licensed electrical contractors employing licensed master or journeymen electricians, or registered apprentice electricians supervised by a licensed master or journeyman electrician shall install all electrical equipment. This requirement is waived for the following, however the waiver does not exempt the following persons from meeting all other code requirements under this act:

Property owned or leased by a person when the person, his partner or a major stockholder of a family corporation is installing the equipment and the property is not for immediate resale;

Oil or gas field operations, including those operations involving exploration, testing, drilling, production or transporting via pipeline of oil or gas, railroads, petroleum refineries, fertilizer manufacturing facilities, foundries, mines and their appurtenant facilities;

Liquefied petroleum, gas, electric or communication facilities exercising their function as public utilities;

Cable-TV, satellite-TV and telecommunications, including data and related services of cable-TV, satellite-TV and telecommunications providers including its contractors and subcontractors provided such contractors and subcontractors are limited to the installation of low voltage cable, A.M. or F.M. radio stations, television stations, phone services, internet services, data services and related services;

Farms or ranches of forty (40) acres or more on deeded land;

Buildings constructed by a school or community college district as part of an industrial arts curriculum, under the direct supervision of a qualified industrial arts instructor. The school or community college district shall have the installations inspected by the state electrical inspector’s office or the local enforcement authority, whichever has jurisdiction, to ensure compliance with W.S.

35-9-120

;

Licensed low voltage electrical contractors employing licensed low voltage technicians or registered low voltage apprentice technicians who may install electrical equipment which falls under the scope of their low voltage license or registration. No low voltage contractor may work on electrical systems which exceed ninety (90) volts unless allowed pursuant to this subsection. The chief electrical inspector may issue a low voltage electrical contractor’s license to contractors not qualified for an electrical contractor’s license but qualified for their low voltage area of expertise for the installation, repair or remodel of:

All electrical systems under ninety (90) volts;

Alarm systems under ninety (90) volts;

Communication systems under ninety (90) volts or current limited communication systems of higher voltage;

Sound systems under ninety (90) volts;

Television systems under ninety (90) volts;

Control systems under ninety (90) volts;

Lawn sprinkler systems under ninety (90) volts.

Licensed limited electrical contractors employing licensed limited technicians or registered limited apprentice technicians who may install electrical equipment which falls under the scope of their limited license or registration. The electrical work shall only include the electrical system on the load side of the disconnect which supplies power to the electrical equipment that they are licensed to work on. The chief electrical inspector may issue a limited electrical contractor’s license to a contractor not qualified for an electrical contractor’s license but qualified in his limited area of expertise for the:

Installation, repair or remodel of heating, ventilating and air conditioning systems limited to wiring on the load side of the equipment disconnect;

Installation, repair or remodel of elevator systems limited to wiring on the load side of the equipment disconnect;

Installation, repair or remodel of sign systems limited to wiring on the load side of the equipment disconnect;

Installation, repair or remodel of water well and irrigation systems limited to wiring on the load side of the equipment disconnect;

Routine repair or maintenance of light fixtures limited to replacement of ballasts and fixture parts.

Employees of rural electric cooperatives, as defined in W.S. 37-17-101(a)(i), when performing the following work:

Installation of new or upgraded service connections or attachments of secondary service wires to any utility point of attachment on all overhead connections of the cooperative’s equipment to the cooperative’s customer’s connections and all underground connections that are in close proximity to conductors in excess of six hundred (600) volts; or

Making repairs on secondary service wires or reattachments of secondary service wires to any utility point of attachment in emergency or outage situations.

Exceptions shall not apply to anyone who contracts or subcontracts to or for any exempt person, partnership or corporation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.23; W.S. 1977, § 35-9-135; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1980, ch. 57, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 1995, ch. 98, § 1; 2006, ch. 109, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, § 2; 2012, ch. 17, § 1; 2014 ch. 88, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, in (a)(iv), inserted “including data and related services of cable-TV providers” and “cable phone services, cable internet services, data services.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, inserted “the following, however the waiver does not exempt the following persons from meeting all other code requirements under this act” in the introductory language of (a); in (a)(iv), inserted “satellite-TV and telecommunications” twice, deleted “cable” preceding “phone,” and preceding “internet”; substituted “local enforcement” for “home rule” in (a)(vi); and added (a)(vii)(G).

The 2012 amendment,

added (a)(ix).

Laws 2012, ch. 17 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 6, 2012.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(viii)(E), deleted “lamps” following “ballasts and fixture parts.”

§ 35-9-124.
Powers and duties of board; appeals.

The board shall:

Adopt rules and regulations to implement this section and to establish minimum standards for:

Training requirements for all classes of electricians;

Licensing requirements for all classes of electricians; and

Reciprocal licenses for any journeyman electrician, master electrician, low voltage technician or limited technician license.

Regarding the installation of electrical equipment and electrical safety standards, hear appeals to determine the suitability of alternate materials and type of construction and to interpret and grant variances from the National Electrical Code.

Any applicant may appeal a decision of the chief electrical inspector to the board.

The board may suspend or cancel the license of any licensee for a repeated or serious violation of this act [§§

35-9-101

through

35-9-130

] or the rules and regulations of the board. A serious violation is any violation that poses a risk of injury or death to persons or is likely to result in property damage exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500.00). A repeated violation is one that occurs within two (2) years of any previously documented violation.

Any person whose license is suspended, cancelled or refused by the board may appeal to the appropriate district court.

Repealed by Laws 2010, ch. 84, § 3.

The board may hear appeals of civil penalties imposed by the department pursuant to W.S.

35-9-130

.

The board may enter into and approve reciprocal license agreements with other states if such agreements conform with the conditions and minimum standards required under W.S. 35-9-126(d).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.24; W.S. 1977, §§ 35-9-136, 35-9-139; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; 2006, ch. 110, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, §§ 2, 3.

Cross references. —

For definitions of “board” and “council,” see §

35-9-102

.

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, inserted “who is otherwise disciplined” in (d); and added (f).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “this section and to establish minimum standards for” for “W.S.

35-9-122

through

35-9-130

” in (a)(i); added (a)(i)(A) through (a)(i)(C); substituted “the National Electrical Code” for “rules and regulations of the council” in (a)(ii); in (c), substituted “may” for “shall” and “a repeated or serious” for “flagrant” in the first sentence, and added the second and third sentences; in (d), deleted “Except as provided by subsection (e) of this section” at the beginning, and “application for a license is denied, who is otherwise disciplined or whose” preceding “license is suspended”; repealed former (e), which read: “Upon receipt from the department of family services of a certified copy of an order from a court to withhold, suspend or otherwise restrict a license issued by the board, the board shall notify the party named in the court order of the withholding, suspension or restriction of the license in accordance with the terms of the court order. No appeal under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act shall be allowed for a license withheld, suspended or restricted under this subsection”; and added (g).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A State Central Panel Hearing Officer System for Wyoming,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 497 (1986).

§ 35-9-125.
Electrical contractor's, low voltage electrical contractor's and limited electrical contractor's licenses.

On or before July 1 of each year, an electrical contractor shall file with the chief electrical inspector a license application in writing for each of his firms. The applicant shall be or actively employ in a full-time capacity a licensed master electrician of record who assumes responsibility to ensure that the National Electrical Code, W.S.

35-9-120

through

35-9-130

and applicable rules of the department are adhered to on all electrical work undertaken by the electrical contractor in the state of Wyoming, and who is not the master electrician of record for, or employed by, any other electrical contractor. The electrical contractor shall pay the fee required by W.S.

35-9-129

for each firm operated by him. If the applicant qualifies, he shall receive a license which bears the date of issue and expires on July 1 next following the date of issue.

On or before July 1 of each year, a low voltage electrical contractor shall file with the chief electrical inspector a license application in writing for each of his firms. The applicant shall be or actively employ in a full-time capacity a licensed low voltage technician of record who assumes responsibility to ensure that the National Electrical Code, W.S.

35-9-120

through

35-9-130

and applicable rules of the department are adhered to on all electrical work undertaken by the low voltage electrical contractor in the state of Wyoming, and who is not the low voltage technician of record for, or employed by, any other low voltage electrical contractor. The low voltage electrical contractor shall pay the fee required by W.S.

35-9-129

for each firm operated by him. The low voltage electrical contractor’s license fee shall be waived for any low voltage electrical contractor not employing additional low voltage technicians or low voltage apprentice technicians other than himself. If the applicant qualifies, he shall receive a license which bears the date of issue and expires on July 1 next following the date of issue.

On or before July 1 of each year, a limited electrical contractor shall file with the chief electrical inspector a license application in writing for each of his firms. The applicant shall be or actively employ in a full-time capacity a licensed limited technician of record who assumes responsibility to ensure that the National Electrical Code, W.S.

35-9-120

through

35-9-130

and applicable rules of the department are adhered to on all electrical work undertaken by the limited electrical contractor in the state of Wyoming, and who is not the limited technician of record for, or employed by, any other limited electrical contractor. The limited electrical contractor shall pay the fee required by W.S.

35-9-129

for each firm operated by him. The limited electrical contractor’s license fee shall be waived for any limited electrical contractor not employing additional limited technicians or limited apprentice technicians other than himself. If the applicant qualifies, he shall receive a license which bears the date of issue and expires on July 1 next following the date of issue.

An electrical contractor, low voltage electrical contractor or limited electrical contractor is entitled to renew his license for the ensuing year by paying the proper fee on or before the date his license expires.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.25; W.S. 1977, § 35-9-137; Laws 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, deleted “of fire prevention and electrical safety” following “W.S.

35-9-120

through

35-9-130

and applicable rules of the department” in (a) through (c).

§ 35-9-126.
Licensing of master electricians, journeymen electricians, low voltage technicians, limited technicians; temporary permits; reciprocal licenses; master electrician of record for only 1 electrical contractor; technician of record for only 1 low voltage or limited electrical contractor.

Applicants for master electrician, journeymen electrician, low voltage technician and limited technician licenses shall apply to the chief electrical inspector on a form furnished by the department and accompanied by the required examination fee. The form shall state the applicant’s full name, his address, the extent of his experience and other information required by the department. An applicant who complies with the rules of the board, is qualified, successfully completes the examination and pays the required license fee shall be issued the proper license by the chief electrical inspector which bears the date of issue. A master license, low voltage technician license and limited technician license shall expire on July 1 in the third year following the year of issue. A journeyman license shall expire on January 1 in the third year following the year of issue. Credit for time spent in any electrical school shall be given to master electricians, journeyman electricians, low voltage technicians or limited technicians for time spent in classes up to a total of two (2) years, or four thousand (4,000) hours, on the work experience requirements.

Each master electrician, journeyman electrician, low voltage technician or limited technician licensed under this act [§§

35-9-101

through

35-9-130

] may renew his license by paying fifty percent (50%) of the proper license fee to the state of Wyoming. Master and journeymen electricians shall provide proof of attendance at not less than sixteen (16) hours of training in the National Electric Code or in advances in the electrical industry meeting criteria established by the department on or before the date his license expires. At least eight (8) of the required sixteen (16) hours of training shall specifically cover the National Electrical Code. An electrician or technician who applies for renewal of his expired license within forty-five (45) days after its expiration and is otherwise entitled to renewal of his license shall have his license renewed by paying an additional fee of fifty dollars ($50.00).

The department shall issue temporary permits to engage in the work of a journeyman electrician, low voltage technician or limited technician to a person who applies, furnishes satisfactory evidence of experience to qualify for the examination and pays the required fee. Temporary permits shall continue in effect not longer than one hundred fifty (150) days and may be revoked by the department at any time.

The department may issue a reciprocal license to any applicant for a journeyman electrician, master electrician, low voltage technician or limited technician license if the applicant has obtained an out-of-state or foreign license through an examination which is equal to or exceeds the Wyoming journeyman electrician’s, master electrician’s, low voltage technician’s or limited technician’s examination.

through (g) Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 158, § 2.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.26; Laws 1976, ch. 14, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 35-9-138; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1980, ch. 57, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, § 2; 2015 ch. 158, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

For definition of “board,” see § 35-9-102(a)(iii).

National Electrical Code, see 29 CFR § 1910.301.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “department” for “board” throughout (a) through (d).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the third sentence, substituted “rules of the
board” for “rules of the department”; in the fourth sentence, inserted “low voltage technician license and limited technician license”;
deleted the former next-to-last sentence, “A low voltage technician license shall expire on July 1 in the third year following the year of issue. A limited technician license shall expire on July 1 in the third year following the year of issue”; repealed former (e) through (g), pertaining to the master of record and technician of record; and made related changes.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Regulation Review — Act II,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1980).

§ 35-9-127.
Apprentice electricians and apprentice technicians.

An electrical contractor may employ apprentice electricians to assist a licensed journeyman or master electrician. From and after March 1, 1994, apprentice electricians shall be enrolled in a bona fide program of training approved by the bureau of apprenticeship and training, United States department of labor, or present evidence directly to the department that he is enrolled in an apprentice training program which provides training equivalent to a program approved by the bureau of apprenticeship and training, United States department of labor. The department may monitor the apprenticeship programs and receive necessary progress reports. For purposes of determining whether a program provides equivalent training the department shall consider and apply the current bureau of apprenticeship and training standards. Apprentice electricians shall register with the department and update the registration yearly as required by the department. The electrical contractor shall notify the chief electrical inspector in writing of the name and address of each apprentice electrician employed, and the date of employment or termination of employment within ten (10) days of the action. A licensed journeyman or master electrician shall supervise each apprentice electrician. A licensed journeyman or master electrician shall not supervise more than two (2) apprentice electricians at the same time.

A low voltage or limited electrical contractor may employ apprentice technicians to assist a licensed technician. Apprentice technicians shall be enrolled in a program of training as approved by the department. Apprentice technicians shall register with the department and update the registration yearly as required by the department. The low voltage or limited electrical contractor shall notify the chief electrical inspector in writing of the name and address of each apprentice technician employed, and the date of employment or termination of employment within ten (10) days of the action. A licensed technician shall supervise each apprentice technician. A licensed technician shall not supervise more than one (1) apprentice technician at the same time.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.27; W.S. 1977, § 35-9-133; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 1995, ch. 98, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, § 2.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “department” for “board” throughout (a) and (b); and deleted “of fire prevention and electrical safety” preceding “and update the registration yearly” in the fifth sentence of (a) and in the third sentence of (b).

§ 35-9-128.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 190, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1, related to limited licenses to contractors.

§ 35-9-129.
Fees.

The fees for licenses, work permits, examinations and apprentice registrations shall be determined by the department but shall not exceed:

Electrical contractor’s license . . . . . $400.00

Low voltage electrical contractor’s license . . . . . $200.00

Limited electrical contractor’s license . . . . . $200.00

Master electrician license . . . . . $200.00

Journeyman electrician license . . . . . $100.00

Low voltage technician’s license . . . . . $100.00

Limited technician’s license . . . . . $100.00

Temporary working permit for journeyman
electrician, low voltage technician or limited technician . . . . . $ 50.00

Examination fee . . . . . $300.00

Apprentice registration fee . . . . . $ 20.00

Sixty percent (60%) of the fees collected pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited in a separate account for the purpose of providing additional state electrical inspectors. Forty percent (40%) of the fees collected pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be deposited in the general fund.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.29; Laws 1976, ch. 14, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 35-9-140; Laws 1979, ch. 136, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 1999, ch. 128, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2010, ch. 84, § 2.

Cross references. —

For definition of “board,” see § 35-9-102(a)(iii).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “department” for “board” in the introductory language of (a); and in (b), substituted “Sixty percent (60%)” for “Fifty percent (50%)” and “Forty percent (40%)” for “Fifty percent (50%).”

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (b) substituted “a separate account” for “an account within the special revenue fund.”

Applicability. —

Section 2, ch. 239, Laws 1973, provides: “The provisions of this act shall not apply to any interstate carrier of products or personnel included, but not limited to, railways, air lines, motor carriers, both truck and bus, and pipelines which maintain fire inspection personnel and inspect their own premises and systems.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 35-9-130.
Penalties; civil penalties; other remedies.

A person who violates W.S.

35-9-101

through

35-9-130

commits a misdemeanor punishable as follows:

An individual, including an officer or agent of a corporation or association who participates in or is an accessory to the violation may be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, revocation of his license, or fine, imprisonment and revocation; and

A corporation may be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), revocation of its license or both.

Violators of W.S.

35-9-101

through

35-9-130

may be enjoined from continuing the violation by proceedings brought by the district or county and prosecuting attorney or by the attorney general. The department shall make recommendations to the appropriate district attorney, county and prosecuting attorney or attorney general regarding proceedings under this subsection.

A person who violates W.S.

35-9-123

shall pay a civil penalty in an amount the department determines of not more than five hundred dollars ($500.00) for a first offense, or one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) for any subsequent offense within any three (3) month period. The penalty shall be collected from the violator and credited as provided by W.S.

8-1-109

. Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, no penalty under this subsection shall be enforceable for sixty (60) days after delivery of the notice of violation or if the violation has been cured or appealed pursuant to subsection (d) of this section within sixty (60) days after issuance of the notice of violation.

Before the department imposes a civil penalty, the department shall notify the person accused of a violation, in writing, stating specifically the nature of the alleged violation. Upon receipt of a notice of violation the person receiving it shall pay the assessed fine to the department within sixty (60) days or file an appeal to the electrical board. The department shall determine the amount of the civil penalty to be imposed in accordance with the limitations expressed in subsection (c) of this section. Each violation is a separate offense. If an appeal is submitted to the electrical board, the board shall hear the appeal at its next regularly scheduled meeting. At the appeal hearing, the electrical board may uphold the proposed fine, rule that the alleged violation is not substantiated, or reduce the amount of the proposed fine.

A civil penalty may be recovered in an action brought thereon in the name of the state of Wyoming in any court of appropriate jurisdiction. Failure to pay the fine imposed by the department and upheld by the electrical board shall result in suspension of the electrical license until such time as the fine is paid in full.

The provisions of subsections (c) through (e) of this section are in addition to and not instead of any other enforcement provisions contained in this article, except that no criminal penalty shall be applicable if a civil penalty has been imposed under this section for the same violation.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 239, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-436.30; W.S. 1977, §§

35-9-129

, 35-9-139; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1983, ch. 97, § 1; 1993, ch. 190, § 1; 1999, ch. 7, § 1; 2006, ch. 110, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to injunctions, see Rule 65, W.R.C.P.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, added the last sentence in (b); and added (c) through (f).

§ 35-9-131.
Investigation of electrocutions; powers of chief electrical inspector.

Except in cases where a federal agency has and asserts the right to control an investigation under applicable federal law or when an entity or activity involved is regulated by the Wyoming public service commission, the chief electrical inspector, or his designee, may investigate the cause, origin and circumstances of each incident of electrocution or serious injury from electrical contact occurring in the state. In cases where more than one (1) agency has investigative authority over the incident, all agencies shall work together to fully investigate.

In performing the duties imposed by this section, the chief electrical inspector, or his designee, may:

Enter and examine any property, building or premises where any incident occurred;

Enter any property, building or premises adjacent to that in which an incident occurred;

Take full control and custody of the buildings and premises until his examinations and investigations are completed; and

Take testimony under oath and cause the testimony to be reduced to writing. In taking testimony and performing an investigation, the chief electrical inspector or his designee may:

Subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance before him;

Cause to be produced papers he requires in the examination; and

Administer oaths and affirmations to persons appearing as witnesses before him.

When the examination discloses that an incident involved criminal activity, the chief electrical inspector shall transmit a copy of the testimony to the district attorney for the county where the incident occurred.

As used in this section, “incident” means an event in which a person is seriously injured or killed as a result of transient electrical current from an electrical device or installation.

History.

Laws 2010, ch. 84, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2010, ch. 84, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2010.